Alaska, session 34, SB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 23.20.110(r) is amended to read: 05 (r) The department may provide information obtained under this chapter to 06 another state agency, including the University of Alaska, if 07 (1) the disclosure is authorized under 20 C.F.R. 603, as amended; 08 (2) the disclosure is for 09 (A) the statewide workforce and education-related statistics 10 program described under AS 14.42.035; or 11 (B) program evaluation and improvement, educational 12 outreach, or public policy research; and 13 (3) the department has entered into a written agreement with the 14 agency receiving the information, in which the agency agrees not to disclose the 01 information unless the subsequent disclosure is for 02 (A) [THE SUBSEQUENT DISCLOSURE IS FOR] the 03 statewide workforce and education-related statistics program described under 04 AS 14.42.035 [;] and [(B)] the agency is authorized to make the subsequent 05 disclosure under a written agreement between the agency and the Alaska 06 Commission on Postsecondary Education; or 07 (B) program evaluation and improvement, educational 08 outreach, or public policy research and the agency is authorized to make 09 the subsequent disclosure under a written agreement between the agency 10 and the department. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.